California, session 20252026, AB335.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.Section 66076.1 of the Education Code, as added by Chapter 627 of the Statutes of 2024, is amended to read:66076.1.As used in this article, the following definitions apply:(a)“Applicant” means an eligible college or university that applies for a designation pursuant to this article.(b)“College or university” means a University of California, California State University, or California Community Colleges campus, or an independent institution of higher education.(c)“Governing board” means the governing board established pursuant to this article.(d)“Grant applicant” means a college or university that applies for a grant pursuant to this article.(e)“Grant program” means the Designation of California Black-Serving Institutions Grant Program established pursuant to this article.(f)“Managing entity” means the California State University Statewide Central Office for the Advancement of Black Excellence described in this article.(g)“Normal time” means the time it would take a full-time student to complete the requirements for a degree or certificate offered by a college or university.(h)“Recipient” means a college or university that receives a designation pursuant to this article.SECTION 1. Section 66076.1 of the Education Code is amended to read:66076.1. As used in this article, the following definitions apply:(a) “Applicant” means an eligible college or university that applies for a designation pursuant to this article.(b) “College or university” means a University of California, California State University, or California Community Colleges campus, or an independent institution of higher education. education, as defined in Section 66010.(c) “Governing board” means the governing board established pursuant to this article.(d) “Grant applicant” means a college or university that applies for a grant pursuant to this article.(e) “Grant program” means the Designation of California Black-Serving Institutions Grant Program established pursuant to this article.(d)(f) “Managing entity” means the California State University Statewide Central Office for the Advancement of Black Excellence described in this article.(e)(g) “Normal time” means the time it would take a full-time student to complete the requirements for a degree or certificate offered by a college or university.(f)(h) “Recipient” means a college or university that receives a designation pursuant to this article.SEC. 2. Section 66076.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:66076.5. (a) The Designation of California Black-Serving Institutions Grant Program is hereby established as a competitive grant program to provide develop and implement new, or expand existing, academic resources and student support services to underserved Black and African American students and other underserved students. students, including, but not limited to, Black and African American students.(b)The funding for the grant program shall be awarded by the managing entity to recipients and other grant applicants.(b) (1) The governing board shall award a base grant of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) to each grant applicant approved by the governing board to receive the base grant.(2) In addition to the base grant described in paragraph (1), the governing board may award a supplemental grant to a grant applicant approved by the governing board to receive the supplemental grant. A supplemental grant shall be at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), but shall not be more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), as determined by the governing board.(c) A grant applicant is eligible to receive a grant pursuant to subdivision (b) if the grant applicant meets both of the following requirements:(1) Is a recipient of the Designation of California Black-Serving Institution.(2) Submits an application that complies with subdivision (d) to the managing entity on or before the application deadline established by the managing entity pursuant to subdivision (e).(d) An application for a grant pursuant to subdivision (b) shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:(1) A description of the grant applicant’s experience in providing academic resources and student support services to underserved students, including, but not limited to, Black and African American students.(2) A plan for the use of the grant to develop and implement new, or expand existing, academic resources and student support services for underserved students, including, but not limited to, Black and African American students. The plan shall include how the applicant will use the grant to implement the college’s or university’s strategic plan provided pursuant to subparagraph (4) of subdivision (d) of, or paragraph (8) of subdivision (e) of, Section 66076.2, as applicable.(3) A commitment by the grant applicant to allocate from its existing resources a match of twenty-five cents ($0.25) for every one dollar ($1) for a base grant awarded to the grant applicant pursuant to this section. The grant applicant shall demonstrate in its grant application how the college or university will allocate twenty-five cents ($0.25) for every one dollar ($1) awarded as a base grant under the program.(4) Satisfaction of any other criteria established by the managing entity at the direction of the governing board.(c)(e) The managing entity shall act as a neutral administrative body for the grant program. The managing entity shall have all of the following duties under the grant program:(1) Developing an application processes form and a process for grant applicants. applicants to apply for a grant pursuant to this section. This process shall include, but is not limited to, establishing an annual deadline for submission of a grant application on a date determined by the managing entity.(2) Accepting applications from grant applicants. The managing entity shall set one application deadline for the grant program each year on a date determined by the managing entity.(3) Processing and presenting each grant application received to the governing board each year on a date determined by the governing board.(4)Upon the governing board’s approval or denial of a grant applicant’s application, informing the grant applicant of this outcome.(d)The governing board shall award colleges and universities with a grant pursuant to this section based on applications presented by the managing entity pursuant to subdivision (c). The governing board shall complete both of the following actions:(1)Convene to vote on the approval or denial of grant applications.(2)Approve or deny each grant application presented by the managing entity pursuant to subdivision (c).(4) Informing each grant applicant of the outcome of the applicant’s grant application.(5) Allocating, upon approval by the governing board, the funding affiliated with a base grant to each grant applicant approved by the governing board to receive the base grant.(6) Allocating, upon approval by the governing board, the funding affiliated with a supplemental grant to each grant applicant approved by the governing board to receive the supplemental grant.(f) The governing board shall determine which grant applicants shall be awarded a supplemental grant pursuant to this section. The grant applications shall be presented to the governing board by the managing entity on a date determined by the governing board after the application deadline established pursuant to subdivision (e). The governing board shall complete both of the following actions:(1) Convene once a year to vote on awarding supplemental grants to grant applicants.(2) The governing board shall approve or deny a supplemental grant to grant applicants with experience in providing academic resources and student support services to underserved students, including, but not limited to, Black and African American students.(g) The governing board shall be subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(e)(h) Colleges and universities in receipt of a grant pursuant to this section shall comply with both all of the following: following, as applicable:(1)Expend 100 percent of the grant to provide academic resources and support to underserved Black and African American students and other underserved students.(2)On or before June 30 of the year after the grant is awarded, and each June 30 thereafter until the grant is completely expended, submit a detailed accounting of how the grant was expended for the previous fiscal year to the managing entity.(1) Expend 100 percent of the base grant and, if awarded, the supplemental grant on developing and implementing new, or expanding existing, academic resources and student support services for underserved students, including, but not limited to, Black and African American students. These academic resources and student support services may include, but are not limited to, providing for any of the following:(A) Academic and student support learning communities.(B) Advising and counseling services.(C) Mental health counseling and awareness services.(D) Career development, career readiness, and employment services.(E) Supplemental instruction and tutoring.(F) Ethnic studies courses and curriculum development.(G) Student basic needs.(H) Workplace development, apprenticeships, internships, and employment opportunities.(I) Leadership development, internships, and mentorships.(J) Mentorships.(K) Creation, implementation, and evaluation of concurrent supports or support services to increase the academic success of underserved students, including, but not limited to, Black and African American students.(L) Culturally relevant professional development for the college’s or university’s faculty and staff.(2) Expend 20 percent of the commitment to match twenty-five cents ($0.25) for every one dollar ($1) required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) on administrative costs associated with developing and implementing new, or expanding existing, academic resources and student support services to underserved students, including, but not limited to, Black and African American students. The remaining 80 percent of the match of twenty-five cents ($0.25) for every one dollar ($1) shall be expended on academic resources and student support services pursuant to this section.(3) On or before June 30 of the year immediately after receiving a grant pursuant to this section, and each June 30 thereafter, submit a report to the managing entity. Each report shall include, for the reporting year, all of the following:(A) The amount of grant funding received.(B) The amount of grant funding spent.(C) A description of the academic resources and student support services provided to underserved students, including, but not limited to, Black and African American students.(D) The number of underserved students, including, but not limited to, Black and African American students, served.(E) The number of underserved students, including, but not limited to, Black and African American students, served who meet any, or any combination, of the following, if applicable:(i) Completed certifications.(ii) Attained associate degrees.(iii) Attained associate degrees for transfer.(iv) Transferred to a four-year university.(v) Attained a baccalaureate degree.(f)(i) (1) On or before September 15, 2027, and each September 15 thereafter, the managing entity shall submit a report on the grant program to the Department of Finance, the Governor, and the Legislature.(2) A report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include an update on the grant program, including all of the following for the previous fiscal year:(A) The total amount awarded.(B) Each college and university that received a grant. base grant and, if applicable, a supplemental grant pursuant to this section, and the total amount of grant funding received by each college and university pursuant to this section.(C)A summary of how each college and university expended the grant based on information received pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e).(C) A copy of each report provided to the managing entity pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (h).(D) The amount of funds used by the managing entity in the previous year on administrative costs pursuant to Section 66076.6.(3) A report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code.(j) This section shall not prohibit a college or university from applying for a base grant and supplemental grant each year. A college or university may apply for and be awarded a base grant and supplemental grant annually if approved by the governing board.SEC. 3.Section 66076.6 is added to the Education Code, to read:66076.6.(a)The Designation of California Black-Serving Institutions Grant Program Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. Moneys in the fund shall be allocated by the managing entity, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to award grants pursuant to Section 66076.5.(b)The fund may receive donations and contributions from public and private entities, partnerships between public and private entities, fees, cash advances, and transfers from the General Fund as may be specified by law.(c)The managing entity may, upon appropriation by the Legislature, expend up to 3 percent of the moneys in the fund for administrative costs associated with the grant program.SEC. 3. Section 66076.6 is added to the Education Code, to read:66076.6. (a) The Designation of California Black-Serving Institutions Grant Program Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the managing entity for allocation, without regard to fiscal year, for the purposes of awarding base and supplemental grants to colleges and universities pursuant to Section 66076.5.(b) The fund may receive moneys from federal, state, local, and private sources.(c) The managing entity may expend up to 3 percent of the moneys in the fund for administrative costs associated with the grant program.SEC. 4. (a)The sum of seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Designation of California Black-Serving Institutions Grant Program Fund established pursuant to Section 66076.6 of the Education Code for purposes of awarding grants to campuses of the California State University and community college districts that apply for a grant pursuant to Section 66076.5 of the Education Code. It is the intent of the Legislature that these funds are distributed as grants as follows:(1)(a) Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) to campuses of the California State University.(2)(b) Fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) to community college districts.(b)The funds described in subdivision (a) shall be available for expenditure or encumbrance from the 2026–27 fiscal year to the 2031–32 fiscal year, inclusive.